Maryland, session 2025, HB0500.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
10–101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “State correctional facility” has the meaning stated in [§ 11–101(w)] § 11–101
of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
Article – Election Law
2–109.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(3) “Contract” means an agreement in any form entered into by a
governmental entity for a procurement as defined in [§ 11–101(m)(1)] § 11–101 of the State
Finance and Procurement Article.
Article – Natural Resources
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 601
3–103.
(g) (3) (ii) The Service may procure materials, equipment, services, or
supplies by utilizing:
7. Pay–for–success contracting under [§ 13–112.1] § 13–228
of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
3.5–205.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A TECHNICAL PROCUREMENT
TEAM THAT INCLUDES INDIVIDUALS WITH EXPERTISE IN TECHNOLOGY
PROCUREMENT AND AGILE PROCUREMENT.
(B) THE TECHNICAL PROCUREMENT TEAM:
(1) IN COLLABORATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
SERVICES, SHALL DEVELOP MATERIALS THAT ENCOURAGE COST–EFFECTIVE AND
COST–EFFICIENT INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICES SPENDING, INCLUDING
PROCUREMENT TEMPLATES, PROCUREMENT CONTRACTS, AND OTHER
PROCUREMENT MATERIALS; AND
(2) MAY ASSIST A UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT, INCLUDING THE
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES, TO PROCURE INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
SERVICES, INCLUDING:
(I) DRAFTING REQUESTS FOR PROPOSALS;
(II) REVIEWING BIDS AND SELECTING VENDORS; AND
(III) DEVELOPING INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICE
CONTRACTS IN A MANNER THAT ENCOURAGES COMPETITION AND FULL
PARTICIPATION BY VENDORS.
4–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) (1) “Services” means the rendering of time, effort, or work, rather than the
furnishing of a specific physical product other than reports incidental to the required
performance.
– 5 –

Ch. 601 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) “Services” includes maintenance, construction–related services,
architectural services, engineering services, INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICES,
CYBERSECURITY, and the professional, personal, or contractual services provided by
attorneys, accountants, physicians, consultants, and other professionals who are
independent contractors.
(d) “Supplies” means tangible property, including COMMODITIES,
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY HARDWARE AND SOFTWARE, equipment, and materials,
AND INTANGIBLE PROPERTY, INCLUDING INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SOFTWARE.
4–303.
The Secretary may delegate any power or duty set forth in Part I or Part II of this
subtitle OR DIVISION II OF THIS ARTICLE to the Chief Procurement Officer of the Office
of State Procurement.
4–314.
At time intervals set by the Secretary OR CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER, each
unit that procures supplies under Division II of this article shall send to the Secretary OR
CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER estimates of the amount and quality of any needed
supplies.
4–316.
(a) Subject to the initial approval of the Secretary or Chief Procurement Officer,
the appropriate purchasing unit for the following entities may use the services of the
Department to purchase services, materials, supplies, and equipment:
(1) a county;
(2) a municipality;
(3) a governmental unit in the State;
(4) a public or quasi–public agency that:
(i) receives State money; and
(ii) is exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue
Code;
(5) a private elementary or secondary school that:
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 601
(i) either has been issued a certificate of approval from the State
Board of Education or is accredited by the Association of Independent Schools; and
(ii) is exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue
Code; or
(6) a nonpublic institution of higher education as provided under § 17–106
of the Education Article.
11–101.
(a) In this Division II the following words have the meanings indicated unless:
(1) the context clearly requires a different meaning; or
(2) a different definition is provided for a particular title or provision.
(K) “INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3.5–301
OF THIS ARTICLE.
[(k)] (L) “Invitation for bids” means any document used for soliciting bids under
§ 13–103 of this article.
[(l)] (M) “Person” means an individual, receiver, trustee, guardian, personal
representative, fiduciary, or representative of any kind and any partnership, firm,
association, corporation, or other entity.
[(m)] (N) “Primary procurement units” means:
(1) the State Treasurer;
(2) the Department of General Services;
(3) the Department of Transportation;
(4) the University System of Maryland;
(5) the Maryland Port Commission;
(6) the Morgan State University; and
(7) the St. Mary’s College of Maryland.
[(n)] (O) (1) “Procurement” means the process of:
(i) leasing real or personal property as lessee; or
– 7 –

Ch. 601 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) buying or otherwise obtaining supplies, services, construction,
construction related services, architectural services, engineering services, or services
provided under an energy performance contract.
(2) “Procurement” includes the solicitation and award of procurement
contracts and all phases of procurement contract administration.
[(o)] (P) (1) “Procurement contract” means an agreement in any form entered
into by a unit for procurement.
(2) “Procurement contract” does not include:
(i) a collective bargaining agreement with an employee
organization;
(ii) an agreement with a contractual employee, as defined in §
1–101(d) of the State Personnel and Pensions Article;
(iii) a Medicaid, Judicare, or similar reimbursement contract for
which law sets:
1. user or recipient eligibility; and
2. price payable by the State; or
(iv) a Medicaid contract with a managed care organization, as
defined in § 15–101(e) of the Health – General Article as to which regulations adopted by
the Department establish:
1. recipient eligibility;
2. minimum qualifications for managed care organizations;
and
3. criteria for enrolling recipients in managed care
organizations.
[(p)] (Q) “Procurement officer” means an individual authorized by a unit to:
(1) enter into a procurement contract;
(2) administer a procurement contract; or
(3) make determinations and findings with respect to a procurement
contract.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 601
[(q)] (R) “Proposal” means a response to any solicitation other than an invitation
for bids.
[(r)] (S) “Request for proposals” means any document used for soliciting
proposals.
[(s)] (T) “Responsible bidder or offeror” means a person who:
(1) has the capability in all respects to perform fully the requirements for
a procurement contract; and
(2) possesses the integrity and reliability that will ensure good faith
performance.
[(t)] (U) “Responsive bid” means a bid that:
(1) is submitted under § 13–103 of this article; and
(2) conforms in all material respects to the invitation for bids.
[(u)] (V) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, “services”
means:
(i) the labor, time, or effort of a contractor; and
(ii) any product or report necessarily associated with the rendering
of a service.
(2) “Services” includes:
(I) services provided by attorneys, accountants, physicians,
consultants, and other professionals who are independent contractors; AND
(II) INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICES AND
CYBERSECURITY.
(3) “Services” does not include:
(i) construction related services;
(ii) architectural services;
(iii) engineering services; or
(iv) energy performance contract services.
– 9 –

Ch. 601 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(v)] (W) “State” means:
(1) a state, possession, territory, or commonwealth of the United States; or
(2) the District of Columbia.
[(w)] (X) (1) “State correctional facilities” means correctional institutions,
and all places of correctional confinement, that are located within the State of Maryland
and are primarily operated by the Maryland State government.
(2) “State correctional facilities” includes Patuxent Institution.
(Y) “STATEWIDE CONTRACT” MEANS A CONTRACT THAT HAS BEEN
PROCURED BY A PRIMARY PROCUREMENT UNIT TO BE USED BY ANY UNIT OR AN ALL
UNITS OR ANY ENTITY LISTED IN § 4–316 OF THIS ARTICLE.
[(x)] (Z) (1) “Supplies” means:
(i) insurance;
(ii) tangible personal property INCLUDING INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY HARDWARE AND SOFTWARE;
(iii) printing; and
(iv) services necessarily associated with insurance or tangible
personal property.
(2) “Supplies” does not include:
(i) an interest in real property; or
(ii) tangible personal property acquired or used in connection with
an energy performance contract.
[(y)] (AA) (1) “Unit” means an officer or other entity that is in the Executive
Branch of the State government and is authorized by law to enter into a procurement
contract.
(2) “Unit” does not include:
(i) a bistate, multistate, bicounty, or multicounty governmental
agency; or
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 601
(ii) a special tax district, sanitary district, drainage district, soil
conservation district, water supply district, or other political subdivision of the State.
12–107.
(b) Subject to the authority of the Board, jurisdiction over procurement is as
follows:
(2) the Department of General Services may:
(i) engage in or control procurement of:
2. supplies, including supplies under Title 4, Subtitle 3 of
this article, but excluding insurance[, information processing equipment,] and motor
vehicle leases;
[10. information processing equipment and associated
services, as provided in Title 3.5, Subtitle 3 of this article; and]
[11.] 10. telecommunication equipment, systems, or
services, as provided in Title 3.5, Subtitle 4 of this article;
11. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SYSTEM
MODERNIZATION, AS PROVIDED IN TITLE 3.5, SUBTITLE 3 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
12. CYBERSECURITY UPGRADES AND MODERNIZATION,
AS PROVIDED IN TITLE 3.5, SUBTITLE 3 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(3) the Department of Transportation and the Maryland Transportation
Authority, without the approval of any of the other primary procurement units, may engage
in the procurement of:
(i) construction that is related to transportation, as provided in the
Transportation Article;
(ii) construction related services that are related to transportation,
as provided in the Transportation Article;
(iii) architectural or engineering services that are related to
transportation, under Title 13, Subtitle 3 of this article;
(IV) SUPPLIES FOR TRANSPORTATION–RELATED ACTIVITIES,
INCLUDING INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SUPPLIES THAT ARE SUBJECT TO TITLE
3.5 OF THIS ARTICLE, BUT EXCLUDING:
– 11 –

Ch. 601 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. SUPPLIES FUNDED BY THE PROCEEDS FROM STATE
GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS; AND
2. INSURANCE;
(V) SERVICES FOR TRANSPORTATION–RELATED ACTIVITIES,
INCLUDING INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICES THAT ARE SUBJECT TO TITLE
3.5 OF THIS ARTICLE, BUT EXCLUDING BANKING AND FINANCIAL SERVICES UNDER
THE AUTHORITY OF THE STATE TREASURER UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION;
[(iv)] (VI) rolling stock and other property peculiar to the operation
of a transit system, as provided in § 7–403 of the Transportation Article;
[(v)] (VII) supplies for aeronautics related activities, including motor
vehicles and information processing supplies, but excluding:
1. supplies funded by the proceeds from State general
obligation bonds; and
2. insurance; and
[(vi)] (VIII) services for aeronautics related activities, including
information processing services, but excluding banking and financial services under the
authority of the State Treasurer under item (1) of this subsection; AND
(4) the Maryland Port Commission, without the approval of any of the
other primary procurement units, may engage in the procurement of:
(v) leases of real property for port related activities unless the lease
payments are from the General Fund of the State[; and].
[(5) the Department of General Services, without the approval of any other
primary procurement unit, may engage in or control procurement of:
(i) information processing equipment, cloud computing equipment,
and associated services, as provided in Title 3.5, Subtitle 3 of this article;
(ii) information technology system modernization, as provided in
Title 3.5, Subtitle 3 of this article;
(iii) telecommunication equipment, systems, or services, as provided
in Title 3.5, Subtitle 4 of this article; and
(iv) cybersecurity upgrades and modernization, as provided in Title
3.5, Subtitle 3 of this article.]
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 601
12–111.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(3) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph,
“services” has the meaning stated in [§ 11–101(u)] § 11–101 of this article.
13–101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
[(g) “Pay–for–success contracting” means a performance–based procurement
method through which a unit contracts with an organization to deliver services or
commodities in exchange for payment based on the achievement of outcomes.]
[(h)] (G) “Person” includes, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) the State;
(2) a county, a municipal corporation, or any other political subdivision;
and
(3) any unit of the State government or a political subdivision.
[(i)] (H) “Task order” means a procurement process in which only those vendors
with master contracts may compete to provide the services, supplies, or commodities under
the procurement.
13–102.
(a) The following procurement methods are authorized at the procurement
officer’s discretion, where applicable:
(9) architectural, engineering, and land surveying services qualification
based selection under § 13–112 of this subtitle; OR
(10) master contracting under § 13–113 of this subtitle[; or].
[(11) pay–for–success contracting under § 13–112.1 of this subtitle.]
(11) A SOURCE SELECTION METHOD ESTABLISHED UNDER
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
– 13 –

Ch. 601 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) (1) In awarding a procurement contract for human, social, cultural, or
educational service, the preferred method is by competitive sealed proposals under §
13–104 of this subtitle.
(2) In awarding a procurement contract for a lease of real property, the
preferred method is by competitive sealed proposals under § 13–105 of this subtitle.
(3) Procurement under an intergovernmental cooperative purchasing
agreement is appropriate in situations where the State is expected to achieve a better price
as the result of economies of scale or to otherwise benefit by purchasing in cooperation with
another governmental entity.
(C) THE SUBJECT TO APPROVAL BY THE BOARD, THE CHIEF
PROCUREMENT OFFICER MAY ESTABLISH METHODS OF SOURCE SELECTION IN
ADDITION TO THOSE LISTED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION AND PROVIDE
GUIDELINES FOR USAGE.
13–102.1.
(b) (1) Subject to approval by the Board of Public Works, the Chief
Procurement Officer may establish fees for the use of eMaryland Marketplace by an entity
that publishes a notice of a procurement, conducts a procurement, or publishes a notice of
award.
(2) The Chief Procurement Officer may not charge a unit, as defined in [§
11–101(y)] § 11–101 of this article, a fee under this subsection.
13–103.
(a) (2) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, an invitation for bids shall
include:
(v) if the [Secretary of General Services, the Secretary of
Transportation, or the Chancellor of the University System of Maryland] HEAD OF THE
UNIT OR THE HEAD OF THE UNIT’S DESIGNEE has so designated, the small business
preference.
(c) (3) The unit shall publish notice in eMaryland Marketplace at least 20 days
before bid opening if:
(i) the procurement officer reasonably expects bid prices to exceed
[$50,000] THE SMALL PROCUREMENT AMOUNT SPECIFIED IN § 13–109 OF THIS
SUBTITLE or a lower amount set by the Board by regulation in accordance with Title 10,
Subtitle 1 of the State Government Article; and
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 601
(ii) at least part of the procurement contract is to be performed in
this State or the District of Columbia.
(f) Not more than 30 days after the execution and approval of a procurement
contract in excess of [$50,000] THE SMALL PROCUREMENT AMOUNT SPECIFIED IN §
13–109 OF THIS SUBTITLE awarded under this section, or a lower amount set by the Board
by regulation in accordance with Title 10, Subtitle 1 of the State Government Article, a unit
shall publish notice of the award in eMaryland Marketplace.
13–104.
(d) (3) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, AN ORAL PRESENTATION IS REQUIRED WHEN:
1. THE TOTAL VALUE OF THE CONTRACT IS EXPECTED
TO EXCEED $2,000,000 FOR ARCHITECTURAL AND ENGINEERING SERVICES;
2. THE TOTAL VALUE OF THE CONTRACT IS EXPECTED
TO EXCEED $10,000,000 FOR CONSTRUCTION AND CONSTRUCTION RELATED
SERVICES; OR
3. FOR ANY OTHER PROCUREMENT, INCLUDING
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY AND PROFESSIONAL SERVICES, THE TOTAL VALUE OF
THE CONTRACT IS EXPECTED TO EXCEED $5,000,000.
(II) IF THE PROCUREMENT OFFICER MAKES A WRITTEN
DETERMINATION THAT ORAL PRESENTATIONS ARE UNLIKELY TO AID IN THE
EVALUATION PROCESS, ORAL PRESENTATIONS ARE NOT REQUIRED.
(g) A unit shall publish notice of a contract in excess of [$50,000] THE SMALL
PROCUREMENT AMOUNT SPECIFIED IN § 13–109 OF THIS SUBTITLE awarded under
this section, or a lower amount set by the Board by regulation in accordance with Title 10,
Subtitle 1 of the State Government Article in eMaryland Marketplace.
13–106.
(a) A procurement officer may award a procurement contract on the basis of
noncompetitive negotiation if:
(2) the procurement is one of a class for which the [Department of Budget
and Management] CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER OR THE CHIEF PROCUREMENT
OFFICER’S DESIGNEE has approved the use of noncompetitive negotiation; and
13–108.
– 15 –

Ch. 601 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) (1) Except as provided in § 11–205 (“Collusion”), § 10–204 (“Approval for
designated contracts”), § 13–219 (“Required clauses – Nondiscrimination clause”), [§
13–221 (“Disclosures to Secretary of State”),] Title 16 (“Suspension and Debarment of
Contractors”), or Title 17 (“Special Provisions – State and Local Subdivisions”) of this
article, with the approval of the head of a unit, its procurement officer may make an
emergency procurement by any method that the procurement officer considers most
appropriate to avoid or mitigate serious damage to public health, safety, or welfare.
(8) (i) This paragraph applies only to the award of a contract or a
contract modification made under this subsection that, with prior modifications, exceeds
[$50,000] THE SMALL PROCUREMENT AMOUNT SPECIFIED IN § 13–109 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(d) (1) Except as provided in § 11–205 (“Collusion”), § 10–204 (“Approval for
designated contracts”), § 13–219 (“Required clauses – Nondiscrimination clause”),
[§ 13–221 (“Disclosures to Secretary of State”),] Title 16 (“Suspension and Debarment of
Contractors”), or Title 17 (“Special Provisions – State and Local Subdivisions”) of this
article, with the approval of the head of the unit and the [Board] CHIEF PROCUREMENT
OFFICER OR THE CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER’S DESIGNEE, a unit’s procurement
officer may make a procurement on an expedited basis if the head of the unit and the
[Board] HEAD OF THE PRIMARY PROCUREMENT UNIT, HEAD OF THE PRIMARY
PROCUREMENT UNIT’S DESIGNEE, CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER, OR CHIEF
PROCUREMENT OFFICER’S DESIGNEE find that:
(i) urgent circumstances require prompt action;
(ii) an expedited procurement best serves the public interest; and
(iii) the need for the expedited procurement outweighs the benefits of
making the procurement on the basis of competitive sealed bids or competitive sealed
proposals.
(2) The procurement officer shall attempt to obtain as much competition as
reasonably possible TO OBTAIN THE BEST VALUE TO THE STATE WITHIN THE
LIMITATIONS REQUIRING THE USE OF THE EXPEDITED PROCUREMENT.
(3) AFTER AWARDING AN EXPEDITED PROCUREMENT CONTRACT
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, A UNIT SHALL REPORT THE EXPEDITED PROCUREMENT
CONTRACT AND THE JUSTIFICATION FOR THE CONTRACT TO THE BOARD.
13–109.
(F) IF A PRIMARY PROCUREMENT UNIT DETERMINES THAT A UNIT DOES
NOT ADHERE TO THE ESTABLISHED SMALL PROCUREMENT REGULATIONS, THE
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 601
PRIMARY PROCUREMENT UNIT MAY LIMIT OR REVOKE A UNIT’S ABILITY TO
CONDUCT SMALL PROCUREMENTS.
13–110.
(b) (7) If a primary procurement unit sponsors or participates in an
intergovernmental cooperative purchasing agreement, the intergovernmental cooperative
purchasing agreement shall be:
(i) approved by:
1. the [unit] head OF THE PRIMARY PROCUREMENT UNIT
OR THE HEAD OF THE PRIMARY PROCUREMENT UNIT’S DESIGNEE; OR
2. THE CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER OR THE CHIEF
PROCUREMENT OFFICER’S DESIGNEE; and
(ii) subject to any other approval required by law.
[13–112.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Aggregator” means a person that:
(i) provides or contracts for environmental outcomes; or
(ii) provides or raises capital to finance delivery of environmental
outcomes.
(3) “Environmental outcome” means a commodity that is modeled or
directly measured as a single, quantifiable, and certified unit of improvement to the
environment, including a nutrient or carbon benefit.
(4) “Environmental outcomes project” means a project designed to secure
environmental outcomes.
(5) “Evaluator” means a person other than an aggregator that determines
whether environmental outcomes have been achieved based on defined performance
measures.
(6) “Outcome payment” means the money paid when a pay–for–success
contract performance measure is met.
(7) “Quantification plan” means a plan in which an aggregator describes:
– 17 –

Ch. 601 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) the method that will be used to measure or model environmental
outcomes and co–benefits under a pay–for–success contract;
(ii) the compliance monitoring that will occur to ensure that the
actions proposed in the pay–for–success contract are taken and maintained over the life of
the project;
(iii) verification steps that will be carried out by the State to confirm
model results or accurate measurement of environmental outcomes; and
(iv) the timeline for proposed payments under the pay–for–success
contract.
(b) The General Assembly finds and declares that:
(1) pay–for–success contracting shifts the risk of performance to the
contractor because government payment is made only on achievement of outcomes;
(2) social and environmental impact investment is growing dramatically,
and investors are seeking ways to finance and execute pay–for–success contracts in the
State to expand the success of Chesapeake Bay restoration efforts and achieve other public
outcomes; and
(3) it is in the best interest of the State to include pay–for–success
contracting as a procurement option, particularly for units responsible for land
conservation and environmental protection, enhancement, and restoration.
(c) A unit may enter into a pay–for–success contract only if the procurement
officer of the unit determines that:
(1) the contract will produce estimated financial savings or other
quantifiable public benefits for the State; and
(2) a substantial portion of the outcome payment due under the contract
will be paid only after specific outcomes have been documented.
(d) (1) This subsection applies only to procurements by:
(i) the Department of Agriculture;
(ii) the Department of the Environment;
(iii) the Department of Natural Resources;
(iv) the Department of Transportation;
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 601
(v) the Maryland Environmental Service; and
(vi) the Department of General Services.
(2) This subsection does not apply to the purchase of nitrogen load
reductions with funds from the Clean Water Commerce Account of the Bay Restoration
Fund established under § 9–1605.2 of the Environment Article.
(3) (i) A unit specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection may enter into
a pay–for–success contract with an aggregator to procure:
1. delivery of an environmental outcomes project; or
2. already certified environmental outcomes.
(ii) Other State and local entities may participate in a
pay–for–success contract under this subsection in accordance with an intergovernmental
cooperative purchasing agreement under § 13–110 of this subtitle.
(4) A pay–for–success contract executed under this subsection shall
include:
(i) a quantification plan approved by the unit;
(ii) a statement of the environmental outcomes to be procured under
the contract and a description of how defined performance measures will demonstrate
progress in achieving these outcomes;
(iii) requirements regarding the content and frequency of progress
reports regarding the achievement of environmental outcomes;
(iv) a methodology for calculating the amount and timing of outcome
payments to an aggregator when the evaluator determines that the aggregator has
achieved a defined performance measure;
(v) a statement that the basis of payment is the determination of
achievement of environmental outcomes by the evaluator and that payments for those
outcomes do not require itemized billing or cost documentation by the aggregator; and
(vi) terms addressing:
1. compliance with State law;
2. nondiscrimination in employment;
3. contractor indemnification;
– 19 –

Ch. 601 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
4. termination for default; and
5. the unit’s right to inspect the environmental outcomes
project.
(5) A pay–for–success contract executed under this subsection may include
provisions regarding:
(i) long–term maintenance and monitoring of environmental
services, including the establishment of a stewardship fund;
(ii) a requirement that the unit hold contract funds in a reserve
account for outcome payments;
(iii) for agriculture services, payment for achievement of baseline
water quality requirements for nitrogen, phosphorus, or sediment; or
(iv) terminations prior to the first payment under the contract for the
purpose of selling environmental outcomes without penalty to another entity or for any
other reason.
(e) (1) (i) Beginning July 2025 and every 3 years thereafter, the Maryland
Environmental Service shall review and evaluate the results of all pay–for–success
contracts completed under this section for the previous 3 fiscal years.
(ii) The first review conducted under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph shall include a review of all pay–for–success contracts completed under this
section between July 1, 2022, and June 30, 2025.
(2) The review conducted under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall
include:
(i) the cost of each project performed under a contract;
(ii) the length of time taken to complete the project, from the date of
notice to proceed until completion;
(iii) the average cost and project duration for each project type; and
(iv) whether each project met the terms of its contract.
(3) Each unit that enters into a pay–for–success contract under this section
shall execute an agreement with the Maryland Environmental Service to reimburse the
Service for each of the unit’s completed contracts the Service reviews under this section.
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 601
(4) The Maryland Environmental Service shall provide copies of each
review conducted under this subsection to:
(i) each unit for which the Service reviewed and evaluated a
contract; and
(ii) in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the
Senate Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs Committee, the Senate Budget and
Taxation Committee, the House Environment and Transportation Committee, and the
House Appropriations Committee.]
13–113.
(d) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A TASK ORDER
DESIGNATED AS A SMALL BUSINESS RESERVE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 14–502 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, if the unit of the
Executive Branch expects that the total cost of the services, supplies, or commodities will
exceed [$100,000] $500,000, the unit shall issue a solicitation for a task order to all master
contractors in the appropriate category established by the designated procurement unit.
[(2)] (3) If the unit of the Executive Branch expects that the total cost of
the services, supplies, or commodities will [be] EXCEED $100,000 [or less] BUT WILL NOT
EXCEED $500,000, the unit shall issue a solicitation for a task order to a minimum of six
qualified master contractors ON A ROTATING BASIS FOR MASTER CONTRACTS
DESIGNATED BY THE CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER or all master contractors,
whichever is less, in the appropriate category established by the designated procurement
unit.
(4) IF THE UNIT OF THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH EXPECTS THAT THE
TOTAL COST OF THE SERVICES, SUPPLIES, OR COMMODITIES WILL BE $100,000 OR
LESS, THE UNIT SHALL ISSUE A SOLICITATION FOR A TASK ORDER TO A MINIMUM OF
THREE QUALIFIED MASTER CONTRACTORS ON A ROTATING BASIS FOR MASTER
CONTRACTS DESIGNATED BY THE CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER OR ALL MASTER
CONTRACTORS, WHICHEVER IS FEWER, IN THE APPROPRIATE CATEGORY
ESTABLISHED BY THE DESIGNATED PROCUREMENT UNIT.
(e) (1) Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, after a unit of the
Executive Branch receives responses from master contractors to a solicitation for a task
order, the unit shall evaluate the responses and may select a master contractor based on
the response that is determined to be the most advantageous to the State considering the
evaluation factors set forth in the task order.
– 21 –

Ch. 601 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
ORAL PRESENTATIONS ARE REQUIRED PRIOR TO SELECTING A MASTER
CONTRACTOR WHEN:
(I) THE TOTAL VALUE OF THE TASK ORDER IS EXPECTED TO
EXCEED $2,000,000 FOR ARCHITECTURAL AND ENGINEERING SERVICES;
(II) THE TOTAL VALUE OF THE TASK ORDER IS EXPECTED TO
EXCEED $10,000,000 FOR CONSTRUCTION AND CONSTRUCTION RELATED SERVICES;
OR
(III) FOR ALL OTHER PROCUREMENT, INCLUDING INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY AND PROFESSIONAL SERVICES, WHEN THE TOTAL VALUE OF THE TASK
ORDER IS EXPECTED TO EXCEED $5,000,000.
(3) IF THE PROCUREMENT OFFICER MAKES A WRITTEN
DETERMINATION THAT ORAL PRESENTATIONS ARE UNLIKELY TO AID IN THE
EVALUATION PROCESS, ORAL PRESENTATIONS WILL NOT BE REQUIRED.
(f) The requirements of subsections (c)(2), (d), and [(e)] (E)(1) of this section do
not apply to a master contract for construction if the master contract:
(1) is awarded through a competitive process in accordance with this
subtitle; and
(2) states:
(i) how task orders will be awarded; and
(ii) the maximum number of qualified contractors that will be
awarded a master contract for construction.
13–206.
(b) If, with the approval of the [Board] CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER OR
THE CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER’S DESIGNEE, a unit determines that it is fiscally
advantageous or otherwise in the best interests of the State, the unit may:
(1) cancel an invitation for bids, a request for proposals, or other
solicitation; or
(2) reject all bids or proposals.
13–207.
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 601
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a procurement officer may not
require a bidder or offeror to provide bid security on a procurement contract if the
procurement officer expects the price to be [$100,000 or] less THAN OR EQUAL TO THE
SMALL PROCUREMENT AMOUNT SPECIFIED IN § 13–109 OF THIS TITLE.
(b) (1) A procurement officer shall require a bidder or offeror to provide bid
security on a procurement contract for construction if:
(i) the price is expected to exceed [$100,000] THE SMALL
PROCUREMENT AMOUNT SPECIFIED IN § 13–109 OF THIS TITLE; or
(ii) [the price is expected to be $100,000 or less but] REQUIRED BY
federal law or a condition of federal assistance requires the security.
(2) The amount of bid security required for a procurement contract for
construction shall be:
(i) at least 5% of the bid or price proposal; or
(ii) if the bid or price proposal states a rate but not a total price, an
amount determined by the procurement officer.
(c) (1) A procurement officer may require a bidder or offeror to provide bid
security on a procurement contract for services, supplies, or construction related services if
the price of the procurement contract is expected to exceed [$50,000] THE SMALL
PROCUREMENT AMOUNT SPECIFIED IN § 13–109 OF THIS TITLE.
13–216.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a procurement officer may
not require a contractor to provide a performance bond, payment bond, or other security on
a procurement contract for construction, construction related services, services, or supplies
if the price of the procurement contract is [$100,000 or] less THAN OR EQUAL TO THE
SMALL PROCUREMENT AMOUNT SPECIFIED IN § 13–109 OF THIS TITLE.
(b) A procurement officer shall require a contractor to provide a performance
bond, payment bond, or other security if federal law or a condition of federal assistance
requires the security.
(c) If the price of a procurement contract for construction exceeds [$100,000] THE
SMALL PROCUREMENT AMOUNT SPECIFIED IN § 13–109 OF THIS TITLE FOR
CONSTRUCTION, a procurement officer shall require a contractor to provide security as
required under Title 17, Subtitle 1 of this article.
– 23 –

Ch. 601 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(d) A procurement officer may require a contractor to provide a performance bond
or other security on a procurement contract for supplies, services, or construction related
services if:
(1) circumstances warrant security; and
(2) the price of the procurement contract exceeds [$100,000] THE SMALL
PROCUREMENT AMOUNT SPECIFIED IN § 13–109 OF THIS TITLE.
(e) (1) The Board shall adopt regulations to establish separate surety bond
forms for procurement officers to use to require security for:
(i) fixed–price contracts; and
(ii) multiyear contracts.
(2) The form for multiyear contracts shall provide for annual and
renewable contracts.
13–228.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “AGGREGATOR” MEANS A PERSON THAT:
(I) PROVIDES OR CONTRACTS FOR ENVIRONMENTAL
OUTCOMES; OR
(II) PROVIDES OR RAISES CAPITAL TO FINANCE DELIVERY OF
ENVIRONMENTAL OUTCOMES.
(3) “ENVIRONMENTAL OUTCOME” MEANS A COMMODITY THAT IS
MODELED OR DIRECTLY MEASURED AS A SINGLE, QUANTIFIABLE, AND CERTIFIED
UNIT OF IMPROVEMENT TO THE ENVIRONMENT, INCLUDING A NUTRIENT OR
CARBON BENEFIT.
(4) “ENVIRONMENTAL OUTCOMES PROJECT” MEANS A PROJECT
DESIGNED TO SECURE ENVIRONMENTAL OUTCOMES.
(5) “EVALUATOR” MEANS A PERSON OTHER THAN AN AGGREGATOR
THAT DETERMINES WHETHER ENVIRONMENTAL OUTCOMES HAVE BEEN ACHIEVED
BASED ON DEFINED PERFORMANCE MEASURES.
– 24 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 601
(6) “OUTCOME PAYMENT” MEANS THE MONEY PAID WHEN A
PAY–FOR–SUCCESS CONTRACT PERFORMANCE MEASURE IS MET.
(7) “QUANTIFICATION PLAN” MEANS A PLAN IN WHICH AN
AGGREGATOR DESCRIBES:
(I) THE METHOD THAT WILL BE USED TO MEASURE OR MODEL
ENVIRONMENTAL OUTCOMES AND CO–BENEFITS UNDER A PAY–FOR–SUCCESS
CONTRACT;
(II) THE COMPLIANCE MONITORING THAT WILL OCCUR TO
ENSURE THAT THE ACTIONS PROPOSED IN THE PAY–FOR–SUCCESS CONTRACT ARE
TAKEN AND MAINTAINED OVER THE LIFE OF THE PROJECT;
(III) VERIFICATION STEPS THAT WILL BE CARRIED OUT BY THE
STATE TO CONFIRM MODEL RESULTS OR ACCURATE MEASUREMENT OF
ENVIRONMENTAL OUTCOMES; AND
(IV) THE TIMELINE FOR PROPOSED PAYMENTS UNDER THE
PAY–FOR–SUCCESS CONTRACT.
(B) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(1) PAY–FOR–SUCCESS CONTRACTING SHIFTS THE RISK OF
PERFORMANCE TO THE CONTRACTOR BECAUSE GOVERNMENT PAYMENT IS MADE
ONLY ON ACHIEVEMENT OF OUTCOMES;
(2) SOCIAL AND ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT INVESTMENT IS GROWING
DRAMATICALLY, AND INVESTORS ARE SEEKING WAYS TO FINANCE AND EXECUTE
PAY–FOR–SUCCESS CONTRACTS IN THE STATE TO EXPAND THE SUCCESS OF
CHESAPEAKE BAY RESTORATION EFFORTS AND ACHIEVE OTHER PUBLIC
OUTCOMES; AND
(3) IT IS IN THE BEST INTEREST OF THE STATE TO INCLUDE
PAY–FOR–SUCCESS CONTRACTING AS A CONTRACTING OPTION, PARTICULARLY FOR
UNITS RESPONSIBLE FOR LAND CONSERVATION AND ENVIRONMENTAL
PROTECTION, ENHANCEMENT, AND RESTORATION.
(C) A UNIT MAY ENTER INTO A PAY–FOR–SUCCESS CONTRACT ONLY IF THE
PROCUREMENT OFFICER OF THE UNIT DETERMINES THAT:
(1) THE CONTRACT WILL PRODUCE ESTIMATED FINANCIAL SAVINGS
OR OTHER QUANTIFIABLE PUBLIC BENEFITS FOR THE STATE; AND
– 25 –

Ch. 601 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) A SUBSTANTIAL PORTION OF THE OUTCOME PAYMENT DUE UNDER
THE CONTRACT WILL BE PAID ONLY AFTER SPECIFIC OUTCOMES HAVE BEEN
DOCUMENTED.
(D) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO CONTRACTS BY:
(I) THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE;
(II) THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT;
(III) THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES;
(IV) THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION;
(V) THE MARYLAND ENVIRONMENTAL SERVICE; AND
(VI) THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES.
(2) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO THE PURCHASE OF
NITROGEN LOAD REDUCTIONS WITH FUNDS FROM THE CLEAN WATER COMMERCE
ACCOUNT OF THE BAY RESTORATION FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–1605.2 OF
THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(3) (I) A UNIT SPECIFIED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
MAY ENTER INTO A PAY–FOR–SUCCESS CONTRACT WITH AN AGGREGATOR TO
PURCHASE:
1. DELIVERY OF AN ENVIRONMENTAL OUTCOMES
PROJECT; OR
2. ALREADY CERTIFIED ENVIRONMENTAL OUTCOMES.
(II) OTHER STATE AND LOCAL ENTITIES MAY PARTICIPATE IN A
PAY–FOR–SUCCESS CONTRACT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH AN
INTERGOVERNMENTAL COOPERATIVE PURCHASING AGREEMENT UNDER § 13–110
OF THIS TITLE.
(4) A PAY–FOR–SUCCESS CONTRACT EXECUTED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) A QUANTIFICATION PLAN APPROVED BY THE UNIT;
(II) A STATEMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENTAL OUTCOMES TO BE
PROCURED UNDER THE CONTRACT AND A DESCRIPTION OF HOW DEFINED
– 26 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 601
PERFORMANCE MEASURES WILL DEMONSTRATE PROGRESS IN ACHIEVING THESE
OUTCOMES;
(III) REQUIREMENTS REGARDING THE CONTENT AND
FREQUENCY OF PROGRESS REPORTS REGARDING THE ACHIEVEMENT OF
ENVIRONMENTAL OUTCOMES;
(IV) A METHODOLOGY FOR CALCULATING THE AMOUNT AND
TIMING OF OUTCOME PAYMENTS TO AN AGGREGATOR WHEN THE EVALUATOR
DETERMINES THAT THE AGGREGATOR HAS ACHIEVED A DEFINED PERFORMANCE
MEASURE;
(V) A STATEMENT THAT THE BASIS OF PAYMENT IS THE
DETERMINATION OF ACHIEVEMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL OUTCOMES BY THE
EVALUATOR AND THAT PAYMENTS FOR THOSE OUTCOMES DO NOT REQUIRE
ITEMIZED BILLING OR COST DOCUMENTATION BY THE AGGREGATOR; AND
(VI) TERMS ADDRESSING:
1. COMPLIANCE WITH STATE LAW;
2. NONDISCRIMINATION IN EMPLOYMENT;
3. CONTRACTOR INDEMNIFICATION;
4. TERMINATION FOR DEFAULT; AND
5. THE UNIT’S RIGHT TO INSPECT THE ENVIRONMENTAL
OUTCOMES PROJECT.
(5) A PAY–FOR–SUCCESS CONTRACT EXECUTED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION MAY INCLUDE PROVISIONS REGARDING:
(I) LONG–TERM MAINTENANCE AND MONITORING OF
ENVIRONMENTAL SERVICES, INCLUDING THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A STEWARDSHIP
FUND;
(II) A REQUIREMENT THAT THE UNIT HOLD CONTRACT FUNDS
IN A RESERVE ACCOUNT FOR OUTCOME PAYMENTS;
(III) FOR AGRICULTURE SERVICES, PAYMENT FOR
ACHIEVEMENT OF BASELINE WATER QUALITY REQUIREMENTS FOR NITROGEN,
PHOSPHORUS, OR SEDIMENT; OR
– 27 –

Ch. 601 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(IV) TERMINATIONS PRIOR TO THE FIRST PAYMENT UNDER THE
CONTRACT FOR THE PURPOSE OF SELLING ENVIRONMENTAL OUTCOMES WITHOUT
PENALTY TO ANOTHER ENTITY OR FOR ANY OTHER REASON.
(E) (1) BEGINNING JULY 2025 AND EVERY 3 YEARS THEREAFTER, THE
MARYLAND ENVIRONMENTAL SERVICE SHALL REVIEW AND EVALUATE THE
RESULTS OF ALL PAY–FOR–SUCCESS CONTRACTS COMPLETED UNDER THIS SECTION
FOR THE PREVIOUS 3 FISCAL YEARS.
(2) THE REVIEW CONDUCTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE COST OF EACH PROJECT PERFORMED UNDER A
CONTRACT;
(II) THE LENGTH OF TIME TAKEN TO COMPLETE THE PROJECT,
FROM THE DATE OF NOTICE TO PROCEED UNTIL COMPLETION;
(III) THE AVERAGE COST AND PROJECT DURATION FOR EACH
PROJECT TYPE; AND
(IV) WHETHER EACH PROJECT MET THE TERMS OF ITS
CONTRACT.
(3) EACH UNIT THAT ENTERS INTO A PAY–FOR–SUCCESS CONTRACT
UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL EXECUTE AN AGREEMENT WITH THE MARYLAND
ENVIRONMENTAL SERVICE TO REIMBURSE THE MARYLAND ENVIRONMENTAL
SERVICE FOR EACH OF THE UNIT’S COMPLETED CONTRACTS THE MARYLAND
ENVIRONMENTAL SERVICE REVIEWS UNDER THIS SECTION.
(4) THE MARYLAND ENVIRONMENTAL SERVICE SHALL PROVIDE
COPIES OF EACH REVIEW CONDUCTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION TO:
(I) EACH UNIT FOR WHICH THE MARYLAND ENVIRONMENTAL
SERVICE REVIEWED AND EVALUATED A CONTRACT; AND
(II) IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE SENATE COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND
THE ENVIRONMENT, THE SENATE BUDGET AND TAXATION COMMITTEE, THE
HOUSE ENVIRONMENT AND TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE, AND THE HOUSE
APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE.
13–229.
– 28 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 601
(A) BEFORE A UNIT AWARDS ANY PROCUREMENT CONTRACT FOR AN
AMOUNT ABOVE $500,000, THE RECOMMENDED AWARDEE MAY BE REQUIRED TO
SUBMIT A WORKFORCE DIVERSITY PLAN TO THE PROCUREMENT OFFICER.
(B) BEFORE A UNIT AWARDS ANY PROCUREMENT CONTRACT FOR AN
AMOUNT ABOVE $250,000, THE RECOMMENDED AWARDEE MAY BE REQUIRED TO
SUBMIT A SUPPLIER DIVERSITY PLAN TO THE PROCUREMENT OFFICER.
(C) THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF SMALL, MINORITY, AND WOMEN
BUSINESS AFFAIRS IN CONSULTATION WITH THE OFFICE OF STATE PROCUREMENT
SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION THAT INCLUDE:
(1) SUGGESTED CONTENT TO BE INCLUDED IN A WORKFORCE OR
SUPPLIER DIVERSITY PLAN; AND
(2) GUIDANCE FOR UNITS TO COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF
THIS SECTION.
14–106.
(a) In this section, “Committee” means the Pricing and Selection Committee for
Preferred Providers.
(b) There is a Pricing and Selection Committee for Preferred Providers.
(c) The Committee consists of the following [5] 6 members:
(1) the Secretary of Transportation or a designee;
(2) the [Secretary of General Services] CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER
or a designee;
(3) the Secretary of Public Safety and Correctional Services or a designee;
(4) the Assistant Secretary for Vocational Rehabilitation within the State
Department of Education or a designee; [and]
(5) the Secretary of Labor or a designee; AND
(6) THE SPECIAL SECRETARY FOR THE OFFICE OF SMALL,
MINORITY, AND WOMEN BUSINESS AFFAIRS OR A DESIGNEE.
14–108.
– 29 –

Ch. 601 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) There is an Employment Works Program in the [Department of General
Services] GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF SMALL, MINORITY, AND WOMEN BUSINESS
AFFAIRS.
(c) The SPECIAL Secretary [of General Services] FOR THE OFFICE OF SMALL,
MINORITY, AND WOMEN BUSINESS AFFAIRS shall designate Maryland Works, Inc., or
another appropriate coordinating entity, to facilitate the distribution of procurement
contracts for supplies and services among community service providers and individual with
disability owned businesses.
14–203.
(a) By regulation, the [Board] SPECIAL SECRETARY FOR THE OFFICE OF
SMALL, MINORITY, AND WOMEN BUSINESS AFFAIRS shall specify the criteria that a
business must meet to qualify as a small business.
14–204.
The [Board] SPECIAL SECRETARY FOR THE OFFICE OF SMALL, MINORITY,
AND WOMEN BUSINESS AFFAIRS shall adopt regulations to establish procedures for:
(1) compiling and maintaining a comprehensive bidder’s list of small
businesses;
(2) locating potential sources for various construction related services,
supplies, and services and affirmatively seeking to locate potential minority business
enterprise sources for those construction related services, supplies, and services;
(3) helping small businesses to comply with the procedures for bidding on
procurement contracts;
(4) examining requests for construction related services, supplies, and
services to determine when an invitation for bids may be designated for the Small Business
Preference Program;
(5) bidding for a procurement contract designated for a small business
preference;
(6) simplifying procurement specifications and terms, to increase the
opportunities for small business participation;
(7) investigating the responsibility of bidders on small business
preferences; and
– 30 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 601
(8) explaining to a small business the reason for which its bid for a small
business preference was rejected.
14–205.
The Department of Commerce shall help the [Board] SPECIAL SECRETARY FOR
THE OFFICE OF SMALL, MINORITY, AND WOMEN BUSINESS AFFAIRS in establishing
procedures to carry out § 14–204(1) and (2) of this subtitle.
14–302.
(a) (1) (ii) 1. The overall percentage goal shall be established on a
biennial basis by the Special Secretary for the Office of Small, Minority, and Women
Business Affairs, in consultation with the Secretary of Transportation, THE CHIEF
PROCUREMENT OFFICER, and the Attorney General.
(iii) 1. In consultation with the Secretary of Transportation, THE
CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER, and the Attorney General, the Special Secretary for
the Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs shall establish guidelines on a
biennial basis for each unit to consider while determining whether to set subgoals for the
minority groups listed in § 14–301(k)(1)(i)1, 2, 3, 4, and 6 of this subtitle.
(iv) 1. The Special Secretary for the Office of Small, Minority,
and Women Business Affairs, in consultation with the Secretary of Transportation, THE
CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER, and the Attorney General, shall establish goals and
subgoal guidelines that, to the maximum extent feasible, approximate the level of minority
business enterprise participation that would be expected in the absence of discrimination.
(2) The Special Secretary for the Office of Small, Minority, and Women
Business Affairs, in consultation with the Secretary of Transportation, THE CHIEF
PROCUREMENT OFFICER, and the Attorney General, shall establish guidelines for each
unit to consider when determining the appropriate minority business enterprise
participation percentage goal for a procurement contract in accordance with paragraph (3)
of this subsection.
(8) A UNIT MAY CONSIDER ADDING OR INCREASING THE MINORITY
BUSINESS PARTICIPATION GOAL ON A PROCUREMENT CONTRACT:
(I) AT ANY TIME PRIOR TO CONTRACT EXECUTION;
(II) AFTER CONTRACT EXECUTION, WHEN DETERMINED TO BE
IN THE BEST INTEREST OF THE STATE; OR
(III) WHEN THE MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE
PARTICIPATION SCHEDULE HAS BEEN CREATED OR AMENDED.
– 31 –

Ch. 601 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(8) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, A
UNIT MAY CONSIDER MODIFYING THE MINORITY BUSINESS PARTICIPATION GOAL ON
A PROCUREMENT CONTRACT:
1. AT ANY TIME PRIOR TO CONTRACT EXECUTION; OR
2. AFTER CONTRACT EXECUTION, WHEN DETERMINED
TO BE IN THE BEST INTEREST OF THE STATE.
(II) BEFORE A UNIT MAY CONSIDER MODIFYING A MINORITY
BUSINESS PARTICIPATION GOAL UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH,
THE UNIT SHALL:
1. MAKE A DETERMINATION THAT THERE HAS BEEN A
CHANGE IN THE FACTORS ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION;
2. USE THE FACTORS ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(3) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO DETERMINE THE PERCENTAGE MODIFICATION TO THE
MINORITY BUSINESS PARTICIPATION GOAL; AND
3. OBTAIN THE AGREEMENT OF THE CONTRACTOR,
INCLUDING ANY REASONABLE PRICING CONSIDERATIONS.
[(8)] (9) The Special Secretary for the Office of Small, Minority, and
Women Business Affairs shall:
(i) in consultation with the Secretary of Transportation, THE
CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER, and the Attorney General, establish procedures
governing how the participation of minority business enterprise prime contractors is
counted toward contract goals; and
(ii) notwithstanding § 12–101 of this article, adopt regulations
setting forth the procedures established in accordance with this paragraph.
[(9)] (10) (i) 1. If a contractor, including a certified minority
business enterprise, does not achieve all or a part of the minority business enterprise
participation goals on a contract, the unit shall make a finding of whether the contractor
has demonstrated that the contractor took all necessary and reasonable steps to achieve
the goals, including compliance with paragraph (7) of this subsection.
– 32 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 601
2. A waiver of any part of the minority business enterprise
goals for a contract shall be granted if a contractor provides a reasonable demonstration of
good–faith efforts to achieve the goals.
(ii) If the unit determines that a waiver should be granted in
accordance with subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the unit may not require the contractor
to renegotiate any subcontract in order to achieve a different result.
(iii) The head of the unit may waive any of the requirements of this
subsection relating to the establishment, use, and waiver of contract goals for a sole source,
expedited, or emergency procurement in which the public interest cannot reasonably
accommodate use of those requirements.
(iv) 1. Except for waivers granted in accordance with
subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, when a waiver determination is made, the unit shall
issue the determination in writing.
2. The head of the unit shall:
A. keep one copy of the waiver determination and the reasons
for the determination; and
B. forward one copy of the waiver determination to the
Governor’s Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs.
(v) On or before July 31 of each year, each unit shall submit directly
to the Board of Public Works and the Governor’s Office of Small, Minority, and Women
Business Affairs an annual report of waivers requested and waivers granted under this
paragraph.
(vi) The report required under subparagraph (v) of this paragraph
shall contain the following information on those contracts where the unit considered a
contractor’s request for waiver of all or a portion of the minority business enterprise goals:
1. the contract titles, numbers, and dates;
2. the number of waiver requests received;
3. the number of waiver requests granted; and
4. any other information specifically requested by the Board.
[(10)] (11) (i) [1.] This paragraph applies to a bidder or offeror after
submission of a bid or proposal and before the execution of a contract with an expected
degree of minority business enterprise participation.
– 33 –

Ch. 601 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[2. If the bidder or offeror determines that a minority
business enterprise identified in the minority business enterprise participation schedule
has become or will become unavailable or ineligible to perform the work required under the
contract, the bidder or offeror shall notify the unit within 72 hours of making the
determination.]
[(ii) 1. If a minority business enterprise identified in the minority
business enterprise participation schedule submitted with a bid or offer has become or will
become unavailable or ineligible to perform the work required under the contract, the
bidder or offeror may submit a written request with the unit to amend the minority
business enterprise participation schedule.
2. The request to amend the minority business enterprise
participation schedule shall indicate the bidder’s or offeror’s efforts to substitute another
certified minority business enterprise to perform the work that the unavailable or ineligible
minority business enterprise would have performed.
(iii) A minority business enterprise participation schedule may not
be amended unless:
1. the bidder or offeror provides a satisfactory explanation of
the reason for inclusion of the unavailable or ineligible firm on the minority business
enterprise participation schedule; and
2. the amendment is approved by the unit’s procurement
officer after consulting with the unit’s minority business enterprise liaison.]
(II) 1. IF A UNIT’S PROCUREMENT OFFICER DETERMINES
THAT A DEFICIENCY EXISTS IN THE MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE
PARTICIPATION SCHEDULE, THE PROCUREMENT OFFICER SHALL NOTIFY THE
BIDDER OR OFFEROR OF THE DEFICIENCY AND REQUIRE THE BIDDER OR OFFEROR
TO SUBMIT AN AMENDED MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE PARTICIPATION
SCHEDULE WITHIN A REASONABLE TIME PERIOD.
2. A DETERMINATION UNDER SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF
THIS SUBPARAGRAPH SHALL BE MADE IN CONSULTATION WITH THE UNIT’S
MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE LIAISON.
3. AS DIRECTED BY THE NOTIFICATION MADE UNDER
SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, THE BIDDER OR OFFEROR SHALL
SUBMIT AN AMENDED MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE PARTICIPATION SCHEDULE
CORRECTING THE DEFICIENCY IDENTIFIED.
[(11)] (12) (i) This paragraph applies after execution of a contract with
an expected degree of minority business enterprise participation.
– 34 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 601
(ii) The minority business enterprise participation schedule,
including any amendment, shall be attached to and made a part of the executed contract.
(iii) 1. A. Except as provided in subsubsubparagraph B of this
subsubparagraph, for purposes of this subparagraph, good cause for removal of a certified
minority business enterprise after contract execution includes documented
nonperformance by the minority business enterprise or election by the certified minority
business enterprise to cease work on the contract.
B. Failure of a certified minority business enterprise to
provide a bond requested by a contractor in violation of § 13–227 of this article may not be
considered nonperformance by the minority business enterprise.
2. A contractor may not terminate or otherwise cancel the
contract of a certified minority business enterprise subcontractor listed in the minority
business enterprise participation schedule without showing good cause and obtaining the
prior written consent of the minority business enterprise liaison and approval of the head
of the unit.
3. The unit shall send a copy of the written consent obtained
under subsubparagraph 2 of this subparagraph to the Governor’s Office of Small, Minority,
and Women Business Affairs.
(iv) A minority business enterprise participation schedule may [not]
be amended TO ADD TO OR INCREASE MODIFY MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE
PARTICIPATION after the date of contract execution [unless the request is] ONLY IF:
1. IT IS IN THE BEST INTEREST OF THE STATE;
2. IT IS approved by the head of the unit; and
3. the contract is amended.
[(12)] (13) If, during the performance of a contract, a certified minority
business enterprise contractor or subcontractor becomes ineligible to participate in the
Minority Business Enterprise Program because one or more of its owners has a personal
net worth that exceeds the amount specified in § 14–301(k)(3) of this subtitle:
(i) that ineligibility alone may not cause the termination of the
certified minority business enterprise’s contractual relationship for the remainder of the
term of the contract; and
(ii) the certified minority business enterprise’s participation under
the contract shall continue to be counted toward the program and contract goals.
– 35 –

Ch. 601 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(13)] (14) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph,
a nonprofit entity participating as a minority business enterprise on a procurement
contract awarded by a unit before July 1, 2015, may continue to participate in the contract
until the contract expires or otherwise terminates, including all options, renewals, and
other extensions.
(ii) 1. The nonprofit entity’s participation may not be counted
toward achieving the minority business enterprise participation goals in this subsection.
2. The unit may not require that a certified minority
business enterprise be substituted for the nonprofit entity in order to meet the minority
business enterprise goals for the procurement contract.
[(14)] (15) (i) For purposes of this paragraph and paragraph [(15)] (16)
of this subsection, “regular dealer”:
1. means a firm that owns, operates, or maintains a store, a
warehouse, or any other establishment in which the materials, supplies, articles, or
equipment are of the general character described by the specifications required under the
contract and are bought, kept in stock, or regularly sold or leased to the public in the usual
course of business; and
2. does not include a packager, a broker, a manufacturer’s
representative, or any other person that arranges or expedites transactions.
(ii) A unit may apply only 60% of the costs of the materials and
supplies provided by the certified minority business enterprise if the certified minority
business enterprise is a regular dealer for purposes of achieving the minority business
enterprise contract goal.
[(15)] (16) With respect to materials or supplies purchased from a certified
minority business enterprise that is neither a manufacturer nor a regular dealer:
(i) a unit may apply the entire amount of fees or commissions
charged for assistance in the procurement of the materials and supplies, fees, or
transportation charges for the delivery of materials and supplies required on a procurement
toward minority business enterprise contract goals, provided a unit determines the fees to
be reasonable and not excessive as compared with fees customarily allowed for similar
services; and
(ii) a unit may not apply any portion of the costs of the materials and
supplies toward minority business enterprise goals.
14–303.
– 36 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 601
(a) (1) (ii) The Board shall keep a record of information regarding any
waivers requested in accordance with [§ 14–302(a)(9)(i)] § 14–302(A)(10)(I) of this
subtitle and subsection (b)(12) of this section and submit a copy of the record to the General
Assembly on or before October 1 of each year, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article.
(b) These regulations shall include:
(12) consistent with [§ 14–302(a)(9)] § 14–302(A)(10) of this subtitle,
provisions relating to any circumstances under which a unit may waive obligations of the
contractor relating to minority business enterprise participation;
(13) provisions requiring a [monthly] submission to the unit by minority
business enterprises acknowledging all payments received [in the preceding 30 days] OR
ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUESTED BASED ON CRITERIA ESTABLISHED BY THE
GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF SMALL, MINORITY, OR WOMEN BUSINESS AFFAIRS under
a contract governed by this subtitle;
[(17) a requirement that a bid or proposal based on a solicitation with an
expected degree of minority business enterprise participation identify the specific
commitment of certified minority business enterprises at the time of submission;]
[(18)] (17) provisions promoting and providing for the counting and
reporting of certified minority business enterprises as prime contractors;
[(19)] (18) provisions establishing standards to require a minority business
enterprise to perform a commercially useful function on a contract;
[(20)] (19) a requirement that each unit work with the Governor’s Office of
Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs to designate certain procurements as being
excluded from the requirements of § 14–302(a) of this subtitle;
[(21)] (20) provisions promoting and providing for the counting and
reporting of minority business enterprises certified as both a woman–owned business and
a business owned by a member of an ethnic or racial group in accordance with §
14–302(a)(5) of this subtitle; and
[(22)] (21) other provisions that the Board considers necessary or
appropriate to encourage participation by minority business enterprises and to protect the
integrity of the procurement process.
14–401.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
– 37 –

Ch. 601 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(5) (i) [“Services”] SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, “SERVICES” has the meaning stated in [§ 11–101(t)(1) and (2)] § 11–101 of
this article.
(ii) Notwithstanding [§ 11–101(t)(3)] § 11–101 of this article,
“services” includes construction related services and energy performance contract services.
14–502.1.
(a) (1) This section applies to a procurement by any unit or agency of the
Executive Branch of State government for goods, supplies, services, maintenance,
construction, construction–related services, architectural services, or engineering services.
(2) This section does not apply to:
(i) procurements made under Subtitle 1 of this title;
(ii) procurements involving expenditures of federal dollars, to the
extent that inclusion in the small business reserve program conflicts with federal law or
grant provisions;
[(iii) procurements with a total dollar value under $50,000;]
[(iv)] (III) the procurement of human, social, cultural, or educational
services; or
[(v)] (IV) term and master contracts exempted under subsection (c)
of this section.
(b) (1) A procurement with a total dollar value [between $50,000 and
$500,000] OF $1,000,000 OR LESS shall be designated for the small business reserve.
(2) Each unit or agency shall implement this subsection in a manner
consistent with all applicable statutes, including the requirements of Subtitle 3 of this title.
14–504.
(c) The procurement officer of a unit shall award a procurement contract
designated for a small business reserve to the small business that submits a responsive bid
OR A PROPOSAL THAT IS REASONABLY SUSCEPTIBLE OF BEING SELECTED FOR
AWARD that:
(1) is the lowest bid price;
– 38 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 601
(2) if the invitation for bids so provides, is the lowest evaluated bid price;
or
(3) is the bid or proposal most favorable to the State within the small
business reserve.
14–601.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Veteran” [means an individual who is verified as having served on active duty
in the armed forces of the United States, other than for training, and was discharged or
released under conditions other than dishonorable] HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
9–901 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(c) “Veteran–owned small business enterprise” means a for–profit business that:
(1) meets the size standards adopted by the United States Small Business
Administration in 13 C.F.R. 121.201 and any subsequent revision of that regulation; and
(2) is at least 51% owned by one or more individuals who:
(i) are veterans; and
(ii) control the management and daily operations of the business.
14–602.
(a) (1) A unit shall structure procurement procedures, consistent with the
purposes of this subtitle, to try to achieve or exceed an overall percentage goal of the unit’s
total dollar value of procurement contracts to be made directly or indirectly with
veteran–owned small business enterprises.
(2) The Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs shall adopt
regulations that establish the overall percentage goal.
(b) Solicitation documents shall state the expected percentage of veteran–owned
small business enterprise participation based, in part, on:
(1) the potential contracting opportunities available in the procurement
contract, including both prime contracting and subcontracting opportunities, as determined
through analysis of the scope of the work presented in the solicitation documents; and
(2) the availability of veteran–owned small business enterprises to respond
competitively to the potential contracting opportunities.
– 39 –

Ch. 601 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(C) (1) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES TO A BIDDER OR OFFEROR
AFTER SUBMISSION OF A BID OR PROPOSAL AND BEFORE THE EXECUTION OF A
CONTRACT WITH AN EXPECTED DEGREE OF VETERAN–OWNED SMALL BUSINESS
ENTERPRISE PARTICIPATION.
(II) 1. IF A UNIT’S PROCUREMENT OFFICER DETERMINES
THAT A DEFICIENCY EXISTS IN THE VETERAN–OWNED SMALL BUSINESS ENTERPRISE
PARTICIPATION SCHEDULE, THE PROCUREMENT OFFICER SHALL NOTIFY THE
BIDDER OR OFFEROR OF THE DEFICIENCY AND REQUIRE THE BIDDER OR OFFEROR
TO SUBMIT AN AMENDED VETERAN–OWNED SMALL BUSINESS ENTERPRISE
PARTICIPATION SCHEDULE WITHIN A REASONABLE TIME PERIOD.
2. A DETERMINATION UNDER SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF
THIS SUBPARAGRAPH SHALL BE MADE IN CONSULTATION WITH THE UNIT’S
VETERAN–OWNED SMALL BUSINESS ENTERPRISE LIAISON.
3. AS DIRECTED BY THE NOTIFICATION MADE UNDER
SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, THE BIDDER OR OFFEROR SHALL
SUBMIT AN AMENDED VETERAN–OWNED SMALL BUSINESS ENTERPRISE
PARTICIPATION SCHEDULE CORRECTING THE DEFICIENCY IDENTIFIED.
(2) A UNIT MAY CONSIDER ADDING OR INCREASING THE
VETERAN–OWNED SMALL BUSINESS PARTICIPATION GOAL ON A PROCUREMENT
CONTRACT:
(I) AT ANY TIME PRIOR TO CONTRACT EXECUTION;
(II) AFTER CONTRACT EXECUTION, WHEN DETERMINED TO BE
IN THE BEST INTEREST OF THE STATE; OR
(III) WHEN THE VETERAN–OWNED SMALL BUSINESS
ENTERPRISE PARTICIPATION SCHEDULE HAS BEEN CREATED OR AMENDED.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, A
UNIT MAY CONSIDER MODIFYING THE VETERAN–OWNED SMALL BUSINESS
PARTICIPATION GOAL ON A PROCUREMENT CONTRACT:
1. AT ANY TIME PRIOR TO CONTRACT EXECUTION; OR
2. AFTER CONTRACT EXECUTION, WHEN DETERMINED
TO BE IN THE BEST INTEREST OF THE STATE.
– 40 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 601
(II) BEFORE A UNIT MAY CONSIDER MODIFYING A
VETERAN–OWNED SMALL BUSINESS PARTICIPATION GOAL UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH
(I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE UNIT SHALL:
1. MAKE A DETERMINATION THAT THERE HAS BEEN A
CHANGE IN THE FACTORS ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION;
2. USE THE FACTORS ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION
(B) OF THIS SECTION TO DETERMINE THE PERCENTAGE MODIFICATION TO THE
VETERAN–OWNED SMALL BUSINESS PARTICIPATION GOAL; AND
3. OBTAIN THE AGREEMENT OF THE CONTRACTOR,
INCLUDING ANY REASONABLE PRICING CONSIDERATIONS.
(3) THE VETERAN–OWNED SMALL BUSINESS ENTERPRISE
PARTICIPATION SCHEDULE, INCLUDING ANY AMENDMENT, SHALL BE ATTACHED TO
AND MADE A PART OF THE EXECUTED CONTRACT.
(4) A VETERAN–OWNED SMALL BUSINESS ENTERPRISE
PARTICIPATION SCHEDULE MAY BE AMENDED TO ADD TO OR INCREASE MODIFY THE
VETERAN–OWNED SMALL BUSINESS ENTERPRISE PARTICIPATION AFTER THE DATE
OF CONTRACT EXECUTION ONLY IF:
(I) IT IS IN THE BEST INTEREST OF THE STATE;
(II) IT IS APPROVED BY THE HEAD OF THE UNIT; AND
(III) THE CONTRACT IS AMENDED.
[(c)] (D) The provisions of this subtitle do not apply to a unit’s procurement
procedures to the extent that any unit determines that those provisions are in conflict with
an applicable federal program.
14–602.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “VETERAN–OWNED SMALL BUSINESS RESERVE”
MEANS THOSE PROCUREMENTS THAT ARE LIMITED TO RESPONSES FROM
BUSINESSES THAT QUALIFY AS A VETERAN–OWNED SMALL BUSINESS ENTERPRISE.
(B) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THIS SECTION APPLIES TO ALL PROCUREMENTS BY THE DEPARTMENT OF
VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES AND THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT OR ANY
UNIT ACTING ON BEHALF OF THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AND MILITARY
FAMILIES OR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT.
– 41 –

Ch. 601 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(I) PROCUREMENTS MADE UNDER SUBTITLE 1 OF THIS TITLE;
OR
(II) PROCUREMENTS INVOLVING EXPENDITURES OF FEDERAL
DOLLARS, TO THE EXTENT THAT THE REQUIREMENTS IN THIS SECTION CONFLICT
WITH FEDERAL LAW OR OTHER GRANT PROVISIONS.
(C) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBTITLE 5 OF THIS TITLE, ANY PROCUREMENT BY
THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES OR THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT OF GOODS, SUPPLIES, SERVICES, MAINTENANCE, CONSTRUCTION,
CONSTRUCTION RELATED SERVICES, ARCHITECTURAL SERVICES, AND
ENGINEERING SERVICES SHALL BE ELIGIBLE FOR DESIGNATION FOR THE
VETERAN–OWNED SMALL BUSINESS RESERVE.
(D) THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF SMALL, MINORITY, AND WOMEN
BUSINESS AFFAIRS SHALL:
(1) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER
AND THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, ESTABLISH STANDARDS AND GUIDELINES FOR
PARTICIPATION IN THE VETERAN–OWNED SMALL BUSINESS RESERVE PROGRAM
EVERY 5 YEARS;
(2) ESTABLISH GUIDELINES FOR VETERAN–OWNED SMALL BUSINESS
RESERVE PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION; AND
(3) COLLECT DATA REGARDING THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS
AND MILITARY FAMILIES’ AND THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT’S USE OF
VETERAN–OWNED SMALL BUSINESS RESERVE VENDORS.
SUBTITLE 8. INTERNSHIP AND REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM.
14–801.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “COVERED PROCUREMENT” MEANS A PROCUREMENT CONTRACT THAT:
(1) MEETS THE CRITERIA ESTABLISHED BY THE CHIEF
PROCUREMENT OFFICER, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE SECRETARY AND, FOR
– 42 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 601
CONTRACTS SUBJECT TO TITLE 3.5 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE SECRETARY OF
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY, UNDER § 14–802 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(2) IS NOT A PUBLIC WORK CONTRACT SUBJECT TO § 17–202 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(C) “DEPARTMENT” MEANS THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR.
(D) “ELIGIBLE INTERNSHIP PROGRAM” MEANS AN INTERNSHIP PROGRAM
THAT REQUIRES A CONTRACTOR OR OTHER ENTITY TO PROVIDE PAID INTERNSHIPS
THAT MEET STANDARDS ESTABLISHED BY THE SECRETARY.
(E) “REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM” MEANS AN
APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM THAT IS REGISTERED WITH AND APPROVED BY THE
DIVISION OF WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT AND ADULT LEARNING.
(F) “SECRETARY” MEANS THE SECRETARY OF LABOR.
14–802.
(A) THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES TO A COVERED PROCUREMENT MADE BY A
UNIT.
(B) A CONTRACTOR AWARDED A COVERED PROCUREMENT WITH AN
ESTIMATED TOTAL DOLLAR VALUE OF $1,000,000 OR MORE SHALL UTILIZE AN
ELIGIBLE INTERNSHIP PROGRAM.
(C) A CONTRACTOR AWARDED A COVERED PROCUREMENT SHALL UTILIZE A
REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM.
(D) THE CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
SECRETARY AND, FOR CONTRACTS SUBJECT TO TITLE 3.5 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE
SECRETARY OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY:
(1) SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS ESTABLISHING THE DEFINITION OF
“COVERED PROCUREMENT”; AND
(2) MAY ADOPT:
(I) REGULATIONS TO IMPROVE THE RECRUITMENT OR SKILLS
OF EMPLOYEES OF VENDORS; OR
(II) OTHER REGULATIONS NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THIS
SUBTITLE, INCLUDING WAIVER PROCESSES.
– 43 –

Ch. 601 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
14–803.
(A) A CONTRACTOR THAT SUBMITS A BID OR PROPOSAL FOR A COVERED
PROCUREMENT SHALL PROVIDE TO A UNIT WRITTEN VERIFICATION OF:
(1) THE NUMBER OF APPRENTICES OR INTERNS THAT WILL BE
UTILIZED THROUGHOUT THE CONTRACT TERM, INCLUDING POTENTIAL RENEWAL
OPTIONS;
(2) THE WORK TO BE PERFORMED BY APPRENTICES IN A REGISTERED
APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM OR INTERNS IN AN ELIGIBLE INTERNSHIP PROGRAM;
AND
(3) THE DURATION OF THE APPRENTICESHIP OR THE INTERNSHIP.
(B) THE WRITTEN VERIFICATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION SHALL BE PROVIDED BEFORE THE CONTRACTOR MAY BE AWARDED A
CONTRACT FOR A COVERED PROCUREMENT.
14–804.
(A) THE SECRETARY IS RESPONSIBLE FOR ENSURING COMPLIANCE WITH
THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THE SECRETARY SHALL ESTABLISH CRITERIA TO ASSIST UNITS IN
ENSURING CONTRACTOR COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING:
(1) PENALTIES FOR A CONTRACTOR’S FAILURE TO USE APPRENTICES
OR INTERNS AS PROVIDED IN A BID OR PROPOSAL; AND
(2) PROCEDURES FOR REPORTING ALLEGED VIOLATIONS OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
14–805.
(A) A CONTRACTOR THAT IS AWARDED A CONTRACT FOR A COVERED
PROCUREMENT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE WHO FAILS TO USE APPRENTICES FROM A
REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM OR INTERNS FROM AN ELIGIBLE
INTERNSHIP PROGRAM AS PROVIDED IN THE BID OR PROPOSAL SHALL BE LIABLE
FOR AN AMOUNT AS SPECIFIED BY THE CRITERIA ESTABLISHED UNDER § 14–804 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
– 44 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 601
(B) A UNIT SHALL REPORT ALLEGED VIOLATIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE TO THE
DEPARTMENT AS SPECIFIED IN THE CRITERIA ESTABLISHED UNDER § 14–804 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT ALLEGED VIOLATIONS OF THIS
SUBTITLE TO THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, WHICH SHALL DETERMINE
WHETHER TO BRING A CIVIL ACTION AGAINST A PERSON OR BUSINESS FOR A
VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) PENALTIES SHALL BE RECOVERABLE IN CIVIL ACTIONS AND PAID TO
THE STATE APPRENTICESHIP TRAINING FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 17–602 OF
THIS ARTICLE, UNLESS OTHERWISE REQUIRED BY FEDERAL LAW.
(E) THE SECRETARY MAY FILE SUIT TO ENFORCE THIS SUBTITLE IN ANY
COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION.
(F) IN AN ACTION FILED UNDER THIS SECTION, THE COURT SHALL REQUIRE
THE CONTRACTOR TO PAY THE AMOUNT REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION, INCLUDING INTEREST, REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES, AND COURT
COSTS.
SUBTITLE 9. GOOD LABOR PRACTICES PREFERENCE EVALUATION FACTOR.
14–901.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “COMMISSIONER” MEANS THE COMMISSIONER OF LABOR AND
INDUSTRY.
(C) “GOOD LABOR PRACTICES CERTIFIED BUSINESS” MEANS A BUSINESS
THAT MEETS THE QUALIFICATIONS ESTABLISHED UNDER § 14–903 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(D) “GOOD LABOR PRACTICES PREFERENCE” MEANS A PREFERENCE
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 14–904 OF THIS SUBTITLE APPLIED TO BUSINESSES
HOLDING A VALID, CURRENT CERTIFICATION OF THEIR GOOD LABOR PRACTICES.
(C) “GOOD LABOR PRACTICES EVALUATION FACTOR” MEANS A FACTOR FOR
GOOD LABOR PRACTICES THAT WILL BE USED TO EVALUATE TECHNICAL PROPOSALS
RECEIVED FOR PROCUREMENTS BEING CONDUCTED THROUGH THE COMPETITIVE
SEALED PROPOSALS PROCUREMENT METHOD UNDER § 13–104 OF THIS ARTICLE.
– 45 –

Ch. 601 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(E) (D) “PUBLIC BODY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 17–201 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(F) (E) “PUBLIC WORK CONTRACT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
17–201 OF THIS ARTICLE.
14–902.
THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES TO:
(1) PUBLIC WORK CONTRACTS PROCURED BY A PUBLIC BODY; AND
(2) A CONTRACT SUBJECT TO § 18–102 OF THIS ARTICLE.
14–903.
(A) TO OBTAIN INITIAL CERTIFICATION AS A QUALIFY FOR APPLICATION OF
THE GOOD LABOR PRACTICES CERTIFIED BUSINESS EVALUATION FACTOR, A
BUSINESS MUST ATTEST BY AFFIDAVIT THAT, ON ANY CONTRACT SUBJECT TO THIS
SUBTITLE THAT IT IS AWARDED OR UNDER WHICH IT PERFORMS ANY WORK, THE
BUSINESS WILL:
(1) DIRECTLY EMPLOY, AS W–2 EMPLOYEES, ALL PERSONS WORKERS
PERFORMING WORK TASKS ON BEHALF OF THE BUSINESS, EXCEPT FOR A PERSON
EXEMPT UNDER TITLE 3, SUBTITLE 9 OF THE LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE,
UNDER THE CONTRACT;
(2) PAY ALL PERSONS WORKERS BY CHECK OR ELECTRONIC MEANS
AS AVAILABLE AND NOT IN CASH OR CASH EQUIVALENT;
(3) STRICTLY COMPLY WITH ALL LEGAL OBLIGATIONS AS AN
EMPLOYER, INCLUDING ITS OBLIGATIONS AS AN EMPLOYER UNDER TITLE 3, TITLE
5, TITLE 8, OR TITLE 9 OF THE LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE AND, AS
APPLICABLE, UNDER TITLE 17 OR TITLE 18 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(4) PROVIDE ADVANCE WRITTEN NOTIFICATION TO THE
PROCUREMENT AUTHORITY AND TO THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR,
DIVISION OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY, IN A FORM TO BE DETERMINED BY THE
COMMISSIONER, OF ANY SUBCONTRACTORS PERFORMING WORK UNDER THE
CONTRACT;
– 46 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 601
(5) PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE REQUIREMENTS OF ITEMS (1),
(2), AND (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO ANY SUBCONTRACTORS PERFORMING WORK
UNDER THE CONTRACT;
(6) OBTAIN WRITTEN ACKNOWLEDGMENT OF THE NOTICE PROVIDED
IN ITEM (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND OF THE SUBCONTRACTOR’S AGREEMENT TO
ADHERE TO THOSE REQUIREMENTS, TO BE FILED WITH THE COMMISSIONER, IN A
FORM AND MANNER DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSIONER;
(7) SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETE A COMPREHENSIVE CONSULTATION
VISIT BY THE MARYLAND OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY AND HEALTH PROGRAM WITHIN
A REASONABLE TIME DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSIONER, FOLLOWING THE START
OF WORK UNDER THE CONTRACT;
(8) BE JOINTLY AND SEVERALLY LIABLE AS AN EMPLOYER FOR ANY
VIOLATION OF A SUBCONTRACTOR UNDER TITLE 3, TITLE 5, TITLE 8, OR TITLE 9 OF
THE LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE OR TITLE 17 OR TITLE 18 OF THIS ARTICLE
IN CONNECTION WITH THE SUBCONTRACTOR’S PERFORMANCE OF WORK UNDER THE
CONTRACT;
(9) PROMPTLY DISCLOSE TO THE COMMISSIONER, IN A FORM AND
MANNER TO BE PRESCRIBED BY THE COMMISSIONER, ANY SUITS, CHARGES,
DEMANDS, ORDERS, FINDINGS, OR ADJUDICATIONS MADE AGAINST IT IN
CONNECTION WITH VIOLATIONS SUBJECT TO ITEM (1), (2), OR (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION OR AGAINST ANY OF ITS SUBCONTRACTORS AS PROVIDED IN ITEM (8)
OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(10) ON CONTRACTS SUBJECT TO § 18–102 OF THIS ARTICLE, PROVIDE
PROOF THAT THE BUSINESS HAS SECURED A PAYMENT BOND SUFFICIENT TO
ENSURE PAYMENT OF WAGES TO ALL EMPLOYEES PERFORMING WORK UNDER THE
CONTRACT.
(B) (1) A BUSINESS THAT SUBMITS AN APPLICATION TO THE
COMMISSIONER, ON A FORM DEVELOPED BY THE COMMISSIONER, DEMONSTRATING
SATISFACTION OF THE CRITERIA LISTED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, MAY
BE ISSUED A GOOD LABOR PRACTICES CERTIFICATION.
(2) THE CERTIFICATION IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL BE VALID FOR 12 MONTHS FROM THE DATE OF ISSUANCE, PROVIDED THAT
THE BUSINESS’S ELIGIBILITY FOR CERTIFICATION IS MAINTAINED CONTINUOUSLY
DURING THAT PERIOD.
– 47 –

Ch. 601 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(B) A PROCUREMENT OFFICER WHO RECEIVES A PROPOSAL FOR A
COMPETITIVE SEALED PROPOSAL PROCUREMENT THAT IS SUBMITTED WITH THE
AFFIDAVIT DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL EVALUATE
THE PROPOSAL WITH THE GOOD LABOR PRACTICES EVALUATION FACTOR.
(3) (C) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL:
(I) MAINTAIN A LIST OF ALL BUSINESSES WITH CURRENT,
VALID GOOD LABOR PRACTICES CERTIFICATION;
(1) MAINTAIN A LIST FOR THE PRECEDING 12 MONTHS OF ALL
BUSINESSES THAT HAVE SUBMITTED THE AFFIDAVIT DESCRIBED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, CONFIRMING ADHERENCE TO GOOD LABOR
PRACTICES;
(II) (2) PROVIDE THE LIST IN ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO ALL PROCUREMENT OFFICERS AT LEAST ONCE EVERY 3
6 MONTHS AND ON REQUEST; AND
(III) (3) PUBLISH THE LIST IN ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION ON THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR’S PUBLIC
WEBSITE.
(C) A BUSINESS SEEKING TO RENEW ITS CERTIFICATION FOR AN
ADDITIONAL 12–MONTH PERIOD SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE AN UPDATED ATTESTATION AT A TIME AND IN A FORM
DEVELOPED BY THE COMMISSIONER; AND
(2) PROVIDE ANY ADDITIONAL INFORMATION REQUESTED BY THE
COMMISSIONER.
(D) IF THE COMMISSIONER DETERMINES THAT A BUSINESS IS NOT
ELIGIBLE, OR IS NO LONGER ELIGIBLE, FOR CERTIFICATION, THE COMMISSIONER
SHALL:
(1) REVOKE THE CERTIFICATION; AND
(2) REMOVE THE BUSINESS FROM THE LIST OF GOOD LABOR
PRACTICES CERTIFIED BUSINESSES MAINTAINED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION.
– 48 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 601
(D) IF THE COMMISSIONER DETERMINES THAT A BUSINESS IS NOT
FOLLOWING GOOD LABOR PRACTICES, AS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION:
(1) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL REMOVE THE BUSINESS FROM THE
LIST MAINTAINED UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(1) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) THE BUSINESS MAY NOT BE ELIGIBLE FOR THE GOOD LABOR
PRACTICES EVALUATION FACTOR FOR 12 MONTHS FOLLOWING THE
DETERMINATION MADE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(E) THE CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
COMMISSIONER, MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THE PROVISIONS OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
14–904.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PERCENTAGE PREFERENCE” MEANS THE
PERCENTAGE OF THE LOWEST RESPONSIVE BID SUBMITTED BY A RESPONSIBLE
BIDDER WHO IS NOT A GOOD LABOR PRACTICES CERTIFIED BUSINESS BY WHICH A
RESPONSIVE BID BY A GOOD LABOR PRACTICES CERTIFIED BUSINESS MAY:
(1) EXCEED THE LOWEST BID; AND
(2) BE AWARDED A PROCUREMENT CONTRACT UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE.
(B) THE CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
SECRETARY, SHALL ESTABLISH A PERCENTAGE PREFERENCE OF AT LEAST 5% FOR
A GOOD LABOR PRACTICES CERTIFIED BUSINESS.
(C) THE PERCENTAGE PREFERENCE ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION
SHALL BE IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER PREFERENCE FOR WHICH THE BUSINESS IS
QUALIFIED UNDER THIS TITLE.
(A) A GOOD LABOR PRACTICES EVALUATION FACTOR FOR GOOD LABOR
PRACTICES DESCRIBED IN § 14–903(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE INCLUDED IN
THE TECHNICAL EVALUATION FACTORS FOR COMPETITIVE SEALED PROPOSALS FOR
A PROPOSAL SUBMITTED FOR A CONTRACT DESCRIBED IN § 14–902 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(B) THE GOOD LABOR PRACTICES EVALUATION FACTOR SHALL BE:
– 49 –

Ch. 601 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) IF A POINT SYSTEM IS USED FOR EVALUATION OF PROPOSALS, 10%
OF THE TOTAL ALLOCABLE TECHNICAL POINTS; OR
(2) IF A POINT SYSTEM IS NOT USED FOR EVALUATION OF PROPOSALS,
RANKED IN ITS RELATIVE ORDER OF IMPORTANCE.
14–905.
(A) A PERSON MAY NOT ENGAGE IN CONDUCT PROHIBITED UNDER §
14–605(A) OR § 14–606 OF THIS TITLE IN CONNECTION WITH ANY ACT UNDERTAKEN
TO OBTAIN, RENEW, MAINTAIN, OR EXERCISE A GOOD LABOR PRACTICES
CERTIFICATION. TO QUALIFY FOR A GOOD LABOR PRACTICES EVALUATION FACTOR.
(B) THE PENALTIES ESTABLISHED IN §§ 14–605(B) AND (C) AND 14–606 OF
THIS TITLE APPLY TO VIOLATIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
14–906.
IN ADDITION TO THE PENALTIES ESTABLISHED UNDER § 14–905 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, A PERSON THAT WILLFULLY MISREPRESENTS OR WILLFULLY OMITS ANY
MATERIAL MATTER IN CONNECTION WITH AN APPLICATION OR REQUIRED
DISCLOSURE FOR PURPOSES OF OBTAINING OR RETAINING A CONTRACT OR
SUBCONTRACT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE MAY BE SUBJECT TO:
(1) SUSPENSION OR DEBARMENT UNDER TITLE 16 OF THIS ARTICLE;
OR
(2) CIVIL PENALTIES UNDER THE MARYLAND FALSE CLAIMS ACT.
15–103.
(A) It is the policy of the State to make a payment under a procurement contract
[within 30 days]:
(1) WITHIN 30 DAYS after the day on which the payment becomes due
[under the procurement contract; or
(2) if later, after the day on which] AND the unit receives [an] A PROPER
invoice; OR
(2) FOR A SMALL BUSINESS RESERVE CONTRACT, WITHIN 15 DAYS
AFTER THE DAY ON WHICH THE PAYMENT BECOMES DUE AND THE UNIT RECEIVES A
PROPER INVOICE.
– 50 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 601
(B) INTEREST SHALL ACCRUE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 15–104 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
15–111.
(a) Within 60 days after the end of each fiscal year, each primary procurement
unit shall submit to the Chief Procurement Officer a report on each procurement contract
that was awarded during the preceding fiscal year, whether the procurement was
conducted by the primary procurement unit or subject to review by the primary
procurement unit, and:
(1) was exempt from the notice requirements of § 13–103(c) of this article
because the procurement officer reasonably expected that the procurement contract would
be performed entirely outside this State and the District of Columbia;
(2) cost more than [$100,000] THE SMALL PROCUREMENT AMOUNT
SPECIFIED IN § 13–109 OF THIS ARTICLE and was awarded for the procurement of
services, construction related services, architectural services, or engineering services; or
(3) was awarded on the basis of:
(i) § 13–107 of this article (“Sole source procurement”);
(ii) § 13–108(a) of this article (“Emergency procurement”); or
(iii) § 13–108(c) of this article (“Expedited procurement”).
15–112.
(e) [Before January 1, 2017, the] THE Board shall propose UPDATED regulations
AS NEEDED that provide for an expedited change order process for change orders valued
at more than [$50,000] THE SMALL PROCUREMENT AMOUNT SPECIFIED IN § 13–109
OF THIS ARTICLE.
15–112.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “CONTRACT MODIFICATION” MEANS A WRITTEN
ALTERATION THAT:
(1) AFFECTS SPECIFICATIONS, DELIVERY POINT, DATE OF DELIVERY,
PERIOD OF PERFORMANCE, PRICE, QUANTITY, OR OTHER PROVISIONS OF A
PROCUREMENT CONTRACT; AND
(2) IS ACCOMPLISHED BY MUTUAL ACTION OF THE PARTIES TO AN
EXISTING PROCUREMENT CONTRACT.
– 51 –

Ch. 601 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO ALL STATE PROCUREMENT CONTRACTS.
(C) A PROCUREMENT OFFICER MAY APPROVE CONTRACT MODIFICATIONS
UNDER THE FOLLOWING CONDITIONS:
(1) THE CONTRACT MODIFICATION DOES NOT MATERIALLY CHANGE
THE SCOPE OF WORK; AND
(2) THE CONTRACT MODIFICATION DOES NOT INCREASE THE TOTAL
VALUE OF THE CONTRACT TO AN AMOUNT THAT EXCEEDS THE SMALL
PROCUREMENT AMOUNT SPECIFIED IN § 13–109 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(D) THE PRIMARY PROCUREMENT UNIT, THE CHIEF PROCUREMENT
OFFICER, OR THE CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER’S DESIGNEE MAY APPROVE A
CONTRACT MODIFICATION UP TO $1,000,000 $200,000 THAT DOES NOT MATERIALLY
CHANGE THE SCOPE OF WORK.
(E) A PROCUREMENT OFFICER SHALL DOCUMENT A CONTRACT
MODIFICATION MADE UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OR (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(F) THE CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER SHALL ESTABLISH GUIDELINES
FOR THE CONTRACT MODIFICATION PROCESS.
17–103.
(a) (1) Before a public body awards a construction contract exceeding
[$100,000] THE SMALL PROCUREMENT AMOUNT SPECIFIED IN § 13–109 OF THIS
ARTICLE FOR CONSTRUCTION, the contractor shall provide payment security and
performance security that meet the requirements of § 17–104 of this subtitle.
(2) The security shall be:
(i) for performance security, in an amount that the public body
considers adequate for its protection; and
(ii) for payment security, at least 50% of the total amount payable
under the contract.
(b) A public body, other than the State or a unit of the State government, may
require payment security or performance security for a construction contract if:
– 52 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 601
(1) the contract exceeds [$50,000] $100,000 but does not exceed
[$100,000] THE SMALL PROCUREMENT AMOUNT SPECIFIED IN § 13–109 OF THIS
ARTICLE; and
(2) the amount of the security does not exceed 50% of the contract amount.
17–602.
(a) There is a State Apprenticeship Training Fund in the Department.
(b) The Fund consists of:
(1) payments made by contractors or subcontractors in accordance with
this subtitle and Subtitle 6A of this title; [and]
(2) penalties collected as a result of violations of this subtitle and Subtitle
6A of this title; AND
(3) PENALTIES COLLECTED AS A RESULT OF VIOLATIONS OF TITLE
14, SUBTITLE 8 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(e) The Secretary shall use money in the fund to:
(1) promote preapprenticeship programs and other workforce development
programs in the State’s public secondary schools and community colleges that assist
students in preparing for and entering apprenticeship training programs; and
(2) pay any costs associated with carrying out the provisions of this subtitle
and Subtitle 6A of this title OR TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 8 OF THIS ARTICLE.
17–604.
(a) A subcontractor that performs work [valued] at [$100,000 or more] A VALUE
EXCEEDING THE SMALL PROCUREMENT AMOUNT SPECIFIED IN § 13–109 OF THIS
ARTICLE for a covered project shall provide to a unit written verification that:
(1) the subcontractor participates in an apprenticeship training program
for each covered craft in which it will employ persons for the covered project;
(2) the subcontractor will make payments to the Fund; or
(3) the subcontractor will make payments in amounts determined under §
17–605 of this subtitle to a registered apprenticeship program or to an organization that
has registered apprenticeship programs for the purpose of supporting these programs.
19–114.
– 53 –

Ch. 601 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Every contract and subcontract shall contain a nondiscrimination clause that [reads
as follows] IS SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR TO THE FOLLOWING:
“As a condition of entering into this agreement, the company represents and warrants that
it will comply with the State’s Commercial Nondiscrimination Policy, as described under
Title 19 of the State Finance and Procurement Article of the Annotated Code of Maryland.
As part of such compliance, the company may not discriminate on the basis of race, color,
religion, ancestry or national origin, sex, age, marital status, sexual orientation, gender
identity, or on the basis of disability or other unlawful forms of discrimination in the
solicitation, selection, hiring, or commercial treatment of subcontractors, vendors,
suppliers, or commercial customers, nor shall the company retaliate against any person for
reporting instances of such discrimination. The company shall provide equal opportunity
for subcontractors, vendors, and suppliers to participate in all of its public sector and
private sector subcontracting and supply opportunities, provided that nothing contained in
this clause shall prohibit or limit otherwise lawful efforts to remedy the effects of
marketplace discrimination that have occurred or are occurring in the marketplace. The
company understands and agrees that a material violation of this clause shall be considered
a material breach of this agreement and may result in termination of this agreement,
disqualification of the company from participating in State contracts, or other sanctions.
This clause is not enforceable by or for the benefit of, and creates no obligation to, any third
party.”.
19–116.
Every contract that the State enters into shall include LANGUAGE SUBSTANTIALLY
SIMILAR TO the following [language]:
“As a condition of entering into this agreement, upon the request of the Commission on
Civil Rights, and only after the filing of a complaint against the company under Title 19 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article, as amended from time to time, the company
agrees to: provide to the State within 60 days after the request a truthful and complete list
of the names of all subcontractors, vendors, and suppliers that the company has used in the
past 4 years on any of its contracts that were undertaken within the State of Maryland,
including the total dollar amount paid by the contractor on each subcontract or supply
contract. The company further agrees to cooperate in any investigation conducted by the
State pursuant to the State’s Commercial Nondiscrimination Policy as set forth under Title
19 of the State Finance and Procurement Article of the Annotated Code of Maryland, to
provide any documents relevant to any investigation that is requested by the State. The
company understands and agrees that violation of this clause shall be considered a material
breach of this agreement and may result in contract termination, disqualification by the
State from participating in State contracts, and other sanctions.”.
Article – State Government
4–113.
– 54 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 601
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Departments” means:
(i) the Office of the Comptroller;
(ii) the Office of the State Treasurer;
(iii) the Department of Budget and Management;
(iv) the Department of Information Technology; and
(v) the Department of General Services.
(3) “Financial management infrastructure” means the information
technology infrastructure that is used to maintain the general ledger and accountancy for
the State, including subledger functions that enable the management of all payments and
fund transfers throughout the State.
(4) “21st Century Financial Systems Enterprise” means a modern
cloud–based information technology infrastructure.
(b) In consultation with a designated representative from the Modernize
Maryland Oversight Commission, the departments shall:
(5) establish working groups as needed, INCLUDING A WORKING GROUP
TO STUDY WHETHER IMMEDIATE OR PROMPT PAYMENT FEATURES CAN BE ADDED
TO THE 21ST CENTURY FINANCIAL SYSTEMS ENTERPRISE TO DETERMINE
WHETHER BOTH PRIME CONTACTORS AND SUBCONTRACTORS ON A STATE
PROCUREMENT CONTRACT CAN BE PAID BY THE STATE AT THE SAME TIME; and
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
13–401.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) (1) [“Services”] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, “SERVICES” has the meaning stated in § 11–101 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article.
(2) “SERVICES” DOES NOT INCLUDE INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
SERVICES AND CYBERSECURITY.
– 55 –

Ch. 601 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1,
2025, the Procurement Advisor to the Board of Public Works shall conduct a study of the
economic impacts of instituting an in–State preference for Maryland vendors for all State
procurements and submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the Board of
Public Works and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the
General Assembly.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the publisher of the
Annotated Code of Maryland, in consultation with and subject to the approval of the
Department of Legislative Services, shall correct, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, cross–references and terminology rendered incorrect by Section 1 of this
Act. The publisher shall adequately describe any correction that is made in an editor’s note
following the section affected.
SECTION 3. 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 56 –